Utah statutes.
58-61-304.   Qualifications for licensure by examination or endorsement.

(1)  An applicant for licensure as a psychologist based upon education, clinical training, and examination shall:

(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  produce certified transcripts of credit verifying satisfactory completion of a doctoral degree in psychology that includes specific core course work established by division rule under Section 58-1-203, from an institution of higher education whose doctoral program, at the time the applicant received the doctoral degree, met approval criteria established by division rule made in consultation with the board;

(e)  have completed a minimum of 4,000 hours of psychology training as defined by division rule under Section 58-1-203 in not less than two years and under the supervision of a psychologist supervisor approved by the division in collaboration with the board;

(f)  to be qualified to engage in mental health therapy, document successful completion of not less than 1,000 hours of supervised training in mental health therapy obtained after completion of a master's level of education in psychology, which training may be included as part of the 4,000 hours of training required in Subsection (1)(e), and for which documented evidence demonstrates not less than one hour of supervision for each 40 hours of supervised training was obtained under the direct personal face to face supervision of a psychologist approved by the division in collaboration with the board;

(g)  pass the examination requirement established by division rule under Section 58-1-203; and

(h)  meet with the board, upon request for good cause, for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(2)  An applicant for licensure as a psychologist by endorsement based upon licensure in another jurisdiction shall:

(a)  submit an application on a form provided by the division;

(b)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character and professional standing, and not have any disciplinary action pending or in effect against the applicant's psychologist license in any jurisdiction;

(d)  have passed the Utah Psychologist Law and Ethics Examination established by division rule;

(e)  provide satisfactory evidence the applicant is currently licensed in another state, district, or territory of the United States, or in any other jurisdiction approved by the division in collaboration with the board;

(f)  provide satisfactory evidence the applicant has actively practiced psychology in that jurisdiction for not less than 2,000 hours or one year, whichever is greater;

(g)  provide satisfactory evidence that:

(i)  the education, supervised experience, examination, and all other requirements for licensure in that jurisdiction at the time the applicant obtained licensure were substantially equivalent to the licensure requirements for a psychologist in Utah at the time the applicant obtained licensure in the other jurisdiction; or

(ii)  the applicant is:

(A)  a current holder of diplomate status in good standing from the American Board of Professional Psychology;

(B)  currently credentialed as a health service provider in psychology by the National Register of Health Service Providers in Psychology; or

(C)  currently holds a Certificate of Professional Qualification (CPQ) granted by the Association of State and Provincial Psychology Boards; and

(h)  meet with the board, upon request for good cause, for the purpose of evaluating the applicant's qualifications for licensure.

(3) (a)  An applicant for certification as a psychology resident shall comply with the provisions of Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (h).

(b) (i)  An individual's certification as a psychology resident is limited to the period of time necessary to complete clinical training as described in Subsections (1)(e) and (f) and extends not more than one year from the date the minimum requirement for training is completed, unless the individual presents satisfactory evidence to the division and the Psychologist Licensing Board that the individual is making reasonable progress toward passing the qualifying examination or is otherwise on a course reasonably expected to lead to licensure as a psychologist.

(ii)  The period of time under Subsection (3)(b)(i) may not exceed two years past the date the minimum supervised clinical training requirement has been completed.



Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

